California, session 20252026, AB2383.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 14.7 (commencing with Section 945) is added to Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code, to read: Article 14.7. Large Energy Use Facilities Data Centers945. For purposes of this article, all of the following definitions apply:(a) “Costs of serving” includes, as applicable, the costs incurred by a load-serving entity in providing generation, transmission, distribution, energy, capacity, or ancillary electricity services, and any related costs or associated risks with serving a retail electricity consumer or a class of retail electricity consumers. “Costs of serving” does not include upgrades to the electrical transmission system or electrical distribution system necessary to energize a large energy use facility. data center.(b)“Facility” means all buildings, equipment, structures, and other stationary items that are located on a single site, or on contiguous or adjacent sites, and that are owned or operated by the same person or by any person who controls, is controlled by, or is under common control with that person.(c)“Load-serving entity” has the same meaning as defined in Section 380.(b) (1) “Data center” means a facility that primarily contains electronic equipment used to process, store, and transmit digital information, which may be a freestanding structure or a facility within a larger structure, that uses environmental control equipment to maintain the proper conditions for the operation of electronic equipment, except as specified in paragraph (2).(2) “Data center” does not include a publicly funded research facility, public safety facility, publicly funded national security facility, publicly owned facility, or utility facility.(d)(c) “Retail electricity consumer” means the end user of electricity.945.1. (a)On or before January 1, 2028, the commission shall, in a new or existing proceeding, provide for a classification of retail electricity consumers that are large energy use facilities. data centers. The classification of service shall be separate and distinct from classifications of service for other commercial or industrial retail electricity consumers and shall have its own tariff.(b)The commission shall include all of the following facilities, and any additional entities deemed appropriate, in classifying new facilities that did not exist before January 1, 2027, as large energy use facilities for eligibility under this tariff:(1)Facilities interconnected under a retail transmission tariff operating over a minimum peak load value, as determined by the commission.(2)Facilities that meet the criteria in paragraph (1) and that house computing infrastructure, including graphics and central processing units, servers, storage devices, networking equipment, and associated power and cooling systems, for the primary purpose of processing, storing, or distributing electronic data.(c)The commission shall consider how providing the classification pursuant to subdivision (a) will impact the electrification of emissions-intensive, trade-exposed facilities, or entities that provide a public benefit.945.2. An electrical corporation and a large energy use facility data center are not required to use a classification of service provided for under Section 945.1 if the commission has not approved the electrical corporation’s tariff for that classification of service.945.3. (a) Each The commission shall require each electrical corporation that receives a request for to file a transmission and distribution service from a large energy use facility shall ensure that the tariff for any service offered that does at least all of the following:(1) Allocates the costs of serving the class of large energy use facilities data centers in a manner that, at a minimum, is equal or proportional to the cost of serving the class. that ensures that incremental costs for serving the class are not borne by other electrical rate classes.(2)Avoids both of the following:(A)Other classes of retail electricity consumers paying unwarranted costs.(B)Shifting the costs of serving a large energy use facility to another class of retail electricity consumers, including the cost of an electrical corporation meeting load requirements resulting from the provision of electrical service to a large energy use facility.(3)(2) Does not result in, or have the potential to result in, increased costs or unreasonable risk to other retail electricity consumers.(4)Provides for equitable contributions to electrical grid efficiency, reliability, resiliency benefits, and state programs.(5)Includes an equitable portion of costs associated with wildfire mitigation, wildfire liability, climate mandates, and other programs that advance public and social equity that are typically collected from distribution-level ratepayers.(3) Ensures that a data center interconnected at the transmission level pays a reasonable share of the costs relating to wildfire mitigation, wildfire liability, electrification and environmental programs, and other societal cost obligations typically collected from distribution-level ratepayers.(6)(4) Encourages the development of large energy use facilities data centers that bring high-wage and high-skilled jobs to California.(7)Specifies the duration of the contract, the minimum duration of which shall be at least 10 years, and details fees for early termination of the contract to ensure investment costs are covered.(8)Requires the large energy use facility to pay a minimum amount or percentage based on the large energy use facility’s projected electricity usage for the electricity services the electrical corporation is contracted to provide for the duration of the contract.(5) Requires a data center seeking a new transmission interconnection to enter into a contract with the electrical corporation to prepay those interconnection costs and any distribution costs necessitated by the transmission interconnection of the data center. The minimum duration of the contract shall be at least 10 years, and shall include early termination fees sufficient to ensure investment costs are covered.(9)(6) Requires the large energy use facility data center to certify to the commission that its facility meets the requirements of Sections 25545.3.3 and 25545.3.5 of the Public Resources Code.(b)The commission shall require each electrical corporation to submit a proposed transmission and distribution tariff that meets the requirements of this section to the commission for approval. Before approval of the tariff, an electrical corporation may enter into a contract with a large energy use facility if the contract meets all the requirements of this section.(c)This section shall apply to a large energy use facility that commences receiving electricity service from an electrical corporation on or after January 1, 2027.(b) An electrical corporation may submit an exceptional case filing to approve a contract between the electrical corporation and a data center seeking interconnection at the transmission level for those facilities that seek to obtain retail electric service after January 1, 2027, but before the commission has approved a tariff filed pursuant to subdivision (a). A contract entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the requirements of this section.945.4. (a) Each load-serving entity that receives a request for retail electrical The commission shall require each electrical corporation to file a generation service from a large energy use facility shall ensure that the tariff that does at least all of the following:(1) Allocates the costs of serving the class of large energy use facilities data centers in a manner that, at a minimum, is equal or proportional to the cost of serving the class. that ensures that incremental costs for serving the class are not borne by other electrical rate classes.(2)Prohibits participation in a net billing tariff or net energy metering arrangement.(3)Avoids both of the following:(A)Other classes of retail electricity consumers paying unwarranted costs.(B)Shifting the costs of serving a large energy use facility to another class of retail electricity consumers, including the cost of the load-serving entity meeting load requirements resulting from the provision of electricity service to a large energy use facility.(4)Does not impede the load-serving entity’s ability to meet the(2) Supports clean energy targets set forth in Sections 399.15 and 454.52 and other applicable state clean energy policies. policies by facilitating the procurement of, or contracts for, generation necessary to serve data centers pursuant to this article using resources meeting the requirements of Sections 399.15 and 454.52, as determined by the commission.(5)(3) Allows for procurement of, or contracts for, generation resources that support the load-serving entity’s ability to meet the clean energy targets described in paragraph (4).(6)As applicable, provides for(4) Ensures that tariffed data centers provide equitable contributions to reliability and state other programs associated with funded through charges generally collected through the generation component of the tariff. a customer’s bill.(7)(5) Does not result in, or have the potential to result in, increased costs or unreasonable risk to other retail electricity consumers.(8)Specifies the duration of the contract, the minimum duration of which shall be at least 10 years, and details fees for early termination of the contract to ensure costs of serving are covered.(6) Requires a data center to enter into a contract with the electrical corporation to prepay those incremental generation cost increases resulting from the data center’s load. The minimum duration of the contract shall be at least 10 years, and shall include early termination fees sufficient to ensure the costs of serving the data center are covered.(9)(7) Requires the large energy use facility data center to pay a minimum amount or percentage, based on the large energy use facility’s data center’s projected electricity usage for the duration of the contract. a contract established pursuant to this section.(10)(8) Requires the large energy use facility data center to report to the load-serving entity electrical corporation the expected investments in onsite generation throughout the duration of service, before the initial point of service. service before entering into an interconnection agreement.(b)The commission shall require each electrical corporation to submit a proposed generation service tariff that meets the requirements of this section to the commission for approval. Before approval of the tariff, an electrical corporation may enter into a contract with a large energy use facility provided that the contract meets all the requirements of this section.(c)This section shall apply to a new large energy use facility that commences receiving generation service from a load-serving entity on or after January 1, 2027.(d)This section does not authorize the commission to regulate the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by a community choice aggregator, consistent with Section 366.2, or an electric service provider, consistent with Section 394.(9) Ensures that a data center tariffed pursuant to this section does not receive compensation for onsite generation in a manner that would result in cost shifts to other retail electricity consumers.(b) The electrical corporation may submit an exceptional case filing to approve a contract between the electrical corporation and a data center seeking retail electrical service at the transmission level for those facilities that seek to start retail electrical service after January 1, 2027, but before the commission has approved a tariff filed pursuant to subdivision (a). A contract entered into pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the requirements of this section.945.5. (a) Each community choice aggregator, consistent with Section 366.2, or electric service provider, consistent with Section 394, shall adopt a tariff for generation service that is consistent with the following requirements:(1) Allocates the costs of serving the class of data centers in a manner that ensures that incremental costs for serving this class are not borne by other electrical rate classes.(2) Supports the community choice aggregator’s or electric service provider’s ability to meet the clean energy targets set forth in Sections 399.15 and 454.52 and other applicable state clean energy policies by facilitating the procurement of, or contracts for, generation necessary to serve data centers pursuant to this article using resources meeting the requirements of Sections 399.15 and 454.52, as determined by the commission.(3) Ensures that tariffed data centers provide equitable contributions to reliability and other programs funded through charges generally collected through the generation component of a customer’s bill.(4) Does not result in, or have the potential to result in, increased costs to other retail electricity consumers.(5) Requires a data center to enter into a contract with the community choice aggregator or electric service provider. The minimum duration of this contract shall be 10 years, and the contract shall include early termination fees sufficient to ensure investment costs are covered.(6) Requires the data center to pay a minimum amount or percentage, based on the data center’s projected electricity usage for the duration of a contract, established pursuant to this section.(7) Requires the data center to report its expected investments in onsite generation throughout the duration of service.(8) Ensures that a data center tariffed pursuant to this section does not receive compensation for onsite generation in a manner that would result in cost shifts to other retail electricity consumers.(b) This section does not authorize the commission to regulate the rates or terms and conditions of service offered by a community choice aggregator, consistent with Section 366.2, or an electric service provider, consistent with Section 394.945.5.945.6. (a) This article does not expand the amount of retail load eligible to participate in direct access transactions pursuant to Section 365.1.(b) This article shall only apply to a data center that enters into a new interconnection agreement to receive retail electrical service at the transmission level on or after January 1, 2027.SEC. 2.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act or because costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.